src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Augmentation
+Aug:’a’    Number? ;
+Dim:Hom    Number? ;

LEXICON Number
+Pl:pu’ NounQualification?  ;
+Pl:Du’ NounQualification?  ;
+Pl:mey NounQualification?  ;
+Pl:ray NounQualification?  ;

LEXICON NounQualification
+Foc/qoq:qoq    Possession? ;
+Foc/Hey:Hey    Possession? ;
+Foc/na:na      Possession? ;

LEXICON Possession
+PxSg1:wIj  Cases?  ;
+PxSg2:lIj  Cases?  ;
+PxSg3:Daj  Cases?  ;
+PxPl1:maj  Cases?  ;
+PxPl2:raj  Cases?  ;
+PxPl3:chaj Cases?  ;
+PxSg1:wI’  Cases?  ;
+PxSg2:lI’  Cases?  ;
+PxPl1:ma’  Cases?  ;
+PxPl2:ra’  Cases?  ;
+Foc/this:vam   Cases?  ;
+Foc/that:vetlh Cases?  ;

LEXICON Cases
+Loc:Daq    #   ;
+Sep:vo’    #   ;
+Ins:mo’    #   ;
+Bnf:vaD    #   ;
+Foc:’e’    #   ;

! Shorthands

LEXICON Augmentation?
+N:0   Augmentation ;
+N:0   Number?  ;

LEXICON Number?
0   Number  ;
+Sg:0   NounQualification?  ;

LEXICON NounQualification?
0   NounQualification   ;
0   Possession?  ;

LEXICON Possession?
0   Possession  ;
0   Cases?  ;

LEXICON Cases?
0       Cases   ;
+Nom:0  #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
